Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,108
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, establish policies and procedures, prescribe forms, or issue orders as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of the Public Funds Deposit Security Act.

Laws 2019, LB622, § 15.